Hawaii statutes.
[§432:1-108]
Fees. (a) The commissioner
shall collect, in advance, the following fees:

(1) Certificate
of authority:

(A) Application
for a certificate of authority: $900; and

(B) Issuance
of certificate of authority: $600;

(2) Organization
of domestic mutual benefit societies:

(A) Application
for a certificate of registration: $1,500; and

(B) Issuance
of certificate of registration: $150; and

(3) For all
services subsequent to the issuance of a certificate of authority, including
extension of the certificate of authority: $600 per year.

(b) No
certificate of authority shall contain an expiration date, but all certificates
of authority shall be extended by the commissioner from time to time in order
to continue to be valid. When the commissioner issues or extends a certificate
of authority, the commissioner shall determine the date prior to which the
certificate of authority shall be extended and shall so notify the insurer in
writing. This date is called the extension date. The extension date shall be
any date not less than one year and not more than three years after date of
issue or extension of the certificate of authority. If the insurer qualifies,
its certificate of authority shall be extended. The commissioner shall provide
each holder of a certificate of authority at least thirty days' advance written
notice of the applicable extension date. If the fee for the extension of the
certificate of authority is not paid before or on the extension date, a penalty
shall be imposed in the amount of fifty per cent of the fee. The commissioner
shall provide notice in writing of the delinquency of extension and the
imposition of the authorized penalty. If the fee and the penalty are not paid
within thirty days immediately following the date of the notice of delinquency,
the commissioner may revoke the certificate of authority and may not reinstate
the certificate of authority until the fee and penalty have been paid.

(c)
All fees and penalties collected pursuant to this section and penalties
collected pursuant to sections 432:1-105, 432:1-405, and 432:1-407 shall be
deposited to the credit of the compliance resolution fund. [L 2012, c 251, §1; am L 2015, c 63, §12]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next